Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 244.040 is amended to read:
244.040. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a public official  may not use or
attempt to use official position or office to obtain financial  gain or avoidance of financial detriment
for the public official, a relative or member of the household of  the public official, or any business
with which the public  official or a relative or member of the household of the public official is as-
sociated, if the financial gain or avoidance of financial detriment  would not otherwise be available
but for the public official’s holding of the official position or office.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Any part  of an official compensation package as determined by the public body that the
public official serves.
(b) The receipt by a public official  or a relative or member of the household of the public official
of an honorarium or any other item allowed under ORS 244.042.
(c) Reimbursement of expenses.
(d) An unsolicited award for professional achievement.
(e) Gifts that do not exceed the limits specified in ORS 244.025 received by  a public official or
a relative or member of the household of the public official from a source that could reasonably  be
known to have a legislative or administrative interest.
(f) Gifts received by a public official  or a relative or member of the household of the public of-
ficial from a source that  could not reasonably be known to have a legislative or administrative in-
terest.
(g) The receipt by a public official  or a relative or member of the household of the public official
of any item, regardless of value, that is expressly excluded from the definition of “gift” in ORS
244.020.
(h) Contributions made to a legal expense trust  fund established under ORS 244.209 for the
benefit of the public official.
(i) Compensation  received by the public official from any post-secondary institution paid in ex-
change for the public official teaching one or more courses at the institution.
(j) Food, beverages or both provided to a public official by a public body during  meetings
or other official events held by  the public body or as otherwise required to be provided by law
or rule of this state.
Enrolled House Bill 4161 (HB 4161-INTRO) Page 1
(k) Merchandise provided to a public official by a  public body if the cost of the mer-
chandise does not exceed $100 in  a calendar year, except as otherwise provided by policy of
the public body.
(3) A public official may not solicit or  receive, either directly or indirectly, and a person may
not offer or give  to any public official any pledge or promise of future employment, based on any
understanding that the vote, official action  or judgment of the public official would be influenced
by the pledge or promise.
(4) A public official may not attempt to further or further the  personal gain of the public official
through the use of confidential information gained in the course of or by  reason of holding position
as a public official or activities of the public official.
(5) A  former public official may not attempt to further or further the personal gain of any person
through the use of confidential information gained in the course of or by  reason of holding position
as a public official or the activities of the person as a public official.
(6) A person may not attempt  to represent or represent a client for a fee before the governing
body of a public body of which the person is  a member. This subsection does not apply to the
person’s employer, business partner or other associate.
(7) A  current or former public official may not solicit, receive or use public moneys from a
public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, to pay or make payments on a civil penalty imposed on the
current or former public official  by the Oregon Government Ethics Commission in accordance with
ORS 171.992 or 244.350.
(8) The provisions of this section apply regardless of whether actual conflicts  of interest or po-
tential conflicts of interest are announced or disclosed under ORS 244.120.
(9) As used in this section,  the term “post-secondary institution” has the meaning given the term
“eligible post-secondary institution” in ORS 348.180.
SECTION 2.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 24, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4161 (HB 4161-INTRO) Page 2